Hawaii statutes.
§147-52 Grades, standards and
classifications; changes. The standards for grading and classifying food
products that have been or may be hereafter adopted, prescribed, or announced
by the United States Department of Agriculture or by or under authority of the
Congress of the United States are hereby declared to be the official standards
for grading and classifying such food products for the State; provided that the
department of agriculture may establish and prescribe other and different, or
additional, standards for grading and classifying any such products, to the
extent permitted by the laws of the United States, which standards, so
established and prescribed by the department, shall be the official standards
for grading and classifying any such food products for the State. The
department may also establish and prescribe official standards for grading and
classifying any or all food products for which no standards have been adopted,
prescribed, or announced by the United States Department of Agriculture or by
or under authority of the Congress. The department may change any standards
established and prescribed by it hereunder from time to time. [L 1947, c 195,
§2; RL 1955, §22-41; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS
§147-52]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next